New Jersey, session 221, S884.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law or rule or regulation to the contrary, any person who heretofore received or hereafter receives a passing score on an open competitive examination for the position of police officer or firefighter and whose name appeared or appears on an eligible list for that position but who was unable or is unable to complete any other requirements for employment because of active duty of at least 30 days continuous duration in the National Guard or a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, on or after September 11, 2001 and on or before December 28, 2014, known as Operation Enduring Freedom, and on or after January 1, 2015 and on or before the date designated by the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense as the termination date of  Operation Freedoms Sentinel, shall, following expiration of that list, have the person's name placed in order by score on a subsequent eligible list, designated by the person, for the same type of position. Any such person who shall have met the maximum age requirement for a position at the announced closing date of the civil service examination from which the first list of eligibles is or was compiled shall be deemed to have met such maximum age requirement on the date that the person's name is placed on a subsequent eligible list. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.